src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON NounRoot !!= @CODE@
kaisamaa:kaisa#maa n_31 ;
pälvimaa:pälvi#maa n_31 ;
maanpruukimaa:maanpruuki#maa n_31 ;
kehitysmaa:kehitys#maa n_31 ;
krannimaa:kranni#maa n_31 ;
kirkonmaa:kirkon#maa n_31 ;
kirkkomaa:kirkko#maa n_31 ;
mannermaa:manner#maa n_31 ;
pottumaa:pottu#maa n_31 ;
syntymämaa:syntymä#maa n_31 ;
spa:spa n_31 ;
karjatie:karja#tie n_31 ;
läpikulkutie:läpi#kulku#tie n_31 ;
karavaanitie:karavaani#tie n_31 ;
asfalttitie:asfaltti#tie n_31 ;
kiertotie:kierto#tie n_31 ;
oikotie:oiko#tie n_31 ;
iid:iid vanha_n_21C ;
ranch:ranch vanha_n_21C ;
squash:squash vanha_n_21C ;
pitkäperjantai:pitkä#perjantai n_31_ai ;
perjantai:perjantai n_31_ai ;
maanantai:maanantai n_31_ai ;
lauvantai:lauvantai n_31_ai ;
lauvantai+Err/Orth:lauantai n_31_ai ;
helluntai:helluntai n_31_ai ;
paastosunnuntai:paasto#sunnuntai n_31_ai ;
palmusunnuntai:palmu#sunnuntai n_31_ai ;
sunnuntai:sunnuntai n_31_ai ;
helatuorestai:hela#tuorestai n_31_ai ;
kihlatuorestai:kihla#tuorestai n_31_ai ;
tuorestai:tuorestai n_31_ai ;
lihavatiistai:lihava#tiistai n_31_ai ;
tiistai:tiistai n_31_ai ;
mai:mai n_31_ai ;
pii:pii n_31 ;
voi:voi n_31 ;
ruvisjauho:ruvis#jauho n_11 ;
koira-ajo:koira-#ajo n_11 ;
omateko:oma#teko n_11 ;
hakko:hakko n_11 ;
lakko:lakko n_11 ;
savirikko:savi#rikko n_11 ;
kirkko:kirkko n_11 ;
maahansiirtyyjäjoukko:maahansiirtyyjä#joukko n_11 ;
loukko:loukko n_11 ;
koivutanko:koivu#tanko n_11 ;
pikkusisko:pikku#sisko n_11 ;
palo:palo n_11 ;
valo:valo n_11 ;
jalkapallo:jalka#pallo n_11 ;
stämppelikello:stämppeli#kello n_11 ;
sishääntulo:sishään#tulo n_11 ;
kammo:kammo n_11 ; 
teno:teno n_11 ;
riippo:riippo n_11 ;
kuuro:kuuro n_11 ;
raato:raato n_11 ;
veto:veto n_11 ;
liekkiraito:liekki#raito n_11 ;
materiaalinpito:materiaalin#pito n_11 ;
poto:poto n_11 ;
kulttuurimuisto:kulttuuri#muisto n_11 ;
kattilamatto:kattila#matto n_11 ;
joukkokontto:joukko#kontto n_11 ;
vinttikaivo:vintti#kaivo n_11 ;
neuvo:neuvo n_11 ;
paiju:paiju n_11 ;
pukinkraakku:pukin#kraakku n_11 ;
raha-arkku:raha-#arkku n_11 ;
auringonlasku:auringon#lasku n_11 ;
sotku:sotku n_11 ;
ruokahalu:ruoka#halu n_11 ;
Isokarhu:Iso#karhu n_11 ;
nuorisokoulu:nuoriso#koulu n_11 ;
kväänisolmu:kvääni#solmu n_11 ;
skuurausriepu:skuuraus#riepu n_11 ;
kimppu:kimppu n_11 ;
šoru:šoru n_11 ;
pottulepsu:pottu#lepsu n_11 ;
tohtu:tohtu n_11 ;
juttu:juttu n_11 ;
maikuu:mai#kuu n_31 ;
juunikuu:juuni#kuu n_31 ;
desemperikuu:desemperi#kuu n_31 ;
novemperikuu:novemperi#kuu n_31 ;
lamphaankuu:lamphaan#kuu n_31 ;
uusikuu:uusi#kuu n_31 ;
leukaluu:leuka#luu n_31 ;
poskiluu:poski#luu n_31 ;
uu:uu n_31 ;
tikapuu:tika#puu n_31 ;
syttöpuu:syttö#puu n_31 ;
hakopuu:hako#puu n_31 ;
kangaspuut:kangas#puu n_31_pl ;
pikkupuut:pikku#puu n_31_pl ;
riekkipuu:riekki#puu n_31_pl ;
tikapuut:tika#puu n_31_pl ;
tervaspuut:tervas#puu n_31_pl ;
sukupuu:suku#puu n_31 ;
hijansuu:hijan#suu n_31 ;
jovensuu:joven#suu n_31 ;
suu:suu n_31 ;
följy:följy n_11 ;
äsky:äsky n_11 ;
näärännäppy:näärän#näppy n_11 ;
synty:synty n_11 ;
syy:syy n_31 ;
syđänmettä:syđän#mett2ä n_11_ae ;
kilpirauhaskräftä:kilpirauhas#kräftä n_11_ae ;
pyhä:pyhä n_11_ae ;
pahaäijä:paha#äijä n_11_ae ;
ylisyrjä:yli#syrjä n_11_ae ;
käytetyittenpiiliinmyyjä:käytetyittenpiiliin#myyjä n_11_ae ;
myyjä:myyjä n_11_ae ;
risuläjä:risu#läjä n_11_ae ;
keski-ikä:keski-#ikä n_11_ae ;
klasireikä:klasi#reikä n_11_ae ;
tapinreikä:tapin#reikä n_11_ae ;
persetreikä:perset#reikä n_11_ae ;
penkkä:penkkä n_11_ae ;
hillajänkkä:hilla#jänkkä n_11_ae ;
koukkuselkä:koukku#selkä n_11_ae ;
sölkä:sölkä n_11_ae ;
hihtokenkä:hihto#kenkä n_11_ae ;
kruununhärkä:kruunun#härkä n_11_ae ;
nyllä:nyllä n_11_ae ;
kotikylä:koti#kylä n_11_ae ;
syylä:syylä n_11_ae ;
öystäväylä:öystä#väylä n_11_ae ;
ryhmä:ryhmä n_11_ae ;
piimä:piimä n_11_ae ;
neulansilmä:neulan#silmä n_11_ae ;
jokitörmä:joki#törmä n_11_ae ;
köhnä:köhnä n_11_ae ;
haisuheinä:haisu#heinä n_11_ae ;
pahansäänseinä:pahansään#seinä n_11_ae ;
kalaleipä:kala#leipä n_11_ae ;
tervheysleipä:tervheys#leipä n_11_ae ;
puuseppä:puu#seppä n_11_ae ;
syöpä:syöpä n_11_ae ;
perä:perä n_11_ae ;
päivämäärä:päivä#määrä n_11_ae ;
määrä:määrä n_11_ae ;
pyörä:pyörä n_11_ae ;
varhaiskesä:varhais#kesä n_11_ae ;
pesä:pesä n_11_ae ;
ryssä:ryssä n_11_ae ;
häntä:häntä n_11_ae ;
hiilikenttä:hiili#kenttä n_11_ae ;
ulkokenttä:ulko#kenttä n_11_ae ;
hyttä:hyttä n_11_ae ;
doseerausspröittä:doseeraus#spröittä n_11_ae ;
työpöytä:työ#pöytä n_11_ae ;
flakupäivä:flaku#päivä n_11_ae ;
isänpäivä:isän#päivä n_11_ae ;
kielipäivä:kieli#päivä n_11_ae ;
pyhhiinpäivä:pyhhiinpäivä n_11_ae ;
suvipäivä:suvi#päivä n_11_ae ;
uuđenvuođenpäivä:uuđen#vuođen#päivä n_11_ae ;
häät:hää n_31_pl ;
päälisjää:päälis#jää n_31 ;
olkapää:olka#pää n_31 ;
karjaspää:karjas#pää n_31 ; 
naulanpää:naulan#pää n_31 ;
järvenpää:järven#pää n_31 ;
alkupää:alku#pää n_31 ;
pöllöpää:pöllö#pää n_31 ;
hyväsää:hyvä#sää n_31 ;
paskasää:paska#sää n_31 ;
äppö:äppö n_11 ;
pyytö:pyytö n_11 ;
keskiyö:keski#yö n_31 ;
jouluyö:joulu#yö n_31 ;
elämäntyö:elämän#työ n_31 ;
kirjailiijantyö:kirjailiijan#työ n_31 ;
maatyö:maa#työ n_31 ;
semesterityö:semesteri#työ n_31 ;
vastustustyö:vastustus#työ n_31 ;
